Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1279
Certificate of title; issuance; form; county treasurer; duties; filing.

(1) The county treasurer shall issue the certificate of title. The county treasurer shall sign and affix his or her seal to the original certificate of title and deliver the certificate to the applicant if there are no liens on the motorboat. If there are one or more liens on the motorboat, the certificate of title shall be handled as provided in section 37-1282. The county treasurer shall keep on hand a sufficient supply of blank forms which shall be furnished and distributed without charge to manufacturers, dealers, or other persons residing within the county, except that certificates of title shall only be issued by the county treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles. Each county shall issue and file certificates of title using the Vehicle Title and Registration System which shall be provided and maintained by the department.

(2) Each county treasurer of the various counties shall provide his or her seal without charge to the applicant on any certificate of title, application for certificate of title, duplicate copy, assignment or reassignment, power of attorney, statement, or affidavit pertaining to the issuance of a certificate of title. The department shall prescribe a uniform method of numbering certificates of title.

(3) The county treasurer shall (a) file all certificates of title according to rules and regulations of the department, (b) maintain in the office indices for such certificates of title, (c) be authorized to destroy all previous records five years after a subsequent transfer has been made on a motorboat, and (d) be authorized to destroy all certificates of title and all supporting records and documents which have been on file for a period of five years or more from the date of filing the certificate or a notation of lien, whichever occurs later.

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 16;

Laws 2009, LB202, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 16;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 4.

Certificate of title, negligent execution by government employee, see sections 13-910 and 81-8,219.